src/third_party/hyphenation-patterns/src/de/hyph-de-1901.pat.txt
.ab1a
.ab3l
.abo2
.ab3ol
.ab1or
.ab3s2
.ab3u
.ade3n
.ae3
.aft2
.ag2a
.ag4r
.ag2u
.ai2s
.akt2a
.al2e
.al3k
.al3lei
.al5len
.al3se
.al4tei
.alter6s5
.alt1s
.al2tu
.ampe4
.amt2s
.ana1c
.an3d2
.anden6k
.and4ri
.an1er
.ang2
.an3gli
.ang4s2
.angst3
.ani2s
.an3k4
.an3na
.an3s2
.an4si.
.an3z2
.aos4
.ap5p6le.
.aps2
.ari1e
.ar3k2a
.ar4m3ac
.ar4mun
.ar2sc
.ar4tan
.ar4t3ei
.arter4
.ar6t5erh
.ar2tr
.arz2
.as6sest
.as2t
.ata1
.ate2
.at4h
.au3d
.aue2
.au4f3
.aufs2
.au2s1
.au6stes
.auß2
.ax2
.äm3
.är6schl
.ät2h
.ät2s
.äu3
.bahn3
.bah6ner
.baus4
.be3erb
.bel2a
.be3r4a
.be3r2e
.ber4g3a
.ber6g5e6b
.ber4g3r
.ber4tr
.bi4os
.bi2t
.bit1a
.boge2
.bo4s3k
.bu4ser
.bus3se
.bu7s8ser.
.bussy8stem.
.ch4
.char8mes
.chi3er
.dab4
.da2r1
.dar3in
.darm1
.da4te.
.da4tes
.de2al
.de1i
.dein2
.de3lo
.de8ments
.den4ka
.den4kl
.den4ko
.de1o2
.de3r4en
.derma3
.dermas6
.de3sk
.di3el
.di4en2
.dien8sta
.dienst7a8d
.do3b
.do2mo
.do1pe
.dor2f1
.dy2s3
.ebe2r1
.edu3s
.eg2o
.eh2e
.ehe1i
.ei3e2
.ei3f2e
.ei3k
.einbus6
.ein3d
.eine2
.ei4neb
.ein6erl
.eise4
.ei2sp
.eis3s2
.ei4s1t
.ei2tr
.eke2
.ek3li
.el2bi
.el2bl
.el4fei
.el2fl
.el2i
.em3m2
.en1
.en4da
.en4d3er4
.en2d3r
.en4dü
.en2gl
.enn2
.ent3
.en2ta
.en4tei
.en4tio
.en2t1r
.ents2
.epi1
.ep3p
.er4bei
.er8brecht
.er2bu
.er4dan
.er4dei
.erden6k
.er4dep
.er4d3er
.er1e
.ere3c
.erf4
.er1i
.ers2
.er8stein
.erster6
.er8sterb
.er8stritt.
.er8stritten.
.ert2
.er4z3el
.er4zen4
.ese3le
.es3p
.es2st
.es2t
.est6e
.est3r
.et2s
.eu1
.eu3g4
.eu3r4
.eu3t
.eve4r
.ext4
.fe3la
.fer4no
.fe4sta
.fid2
.fi4le.
.fi4len
.fi2s
.flö8s7se.
.flö8s7sen.
.flö8s7ses
.flug1
.fs4
.fu2sc
.ga2me
.gangs4
.ga4s3e
.ga6sten
.ga2t
.gd2
.gebe4a
.geb2l
.gel4b3r
.gel2d1
.ge3lu
.ge5nar
.ge3n4e
.ge3n2o
.gente4
.ge3r4a
.ge3r2e
.ge3ro
.ge3s2
.get4
.ge3u
.glan2
.gla4s3t
.gol6der
.grif8fes
.gus2
.haft3s
.hal5le
.hal2s
.halt4e
.hau4sa
.hau2t1
.he2
.he4bei
.he3fe
.he3le
.her3an
.he3rat
.her6b5ra
.he3rer
.he3ri
.he6r5inn
.hin3u
.hof1e
.ho4fen
.ho4met
.höch2
.ia2
.il3
.im2a
.ima4ge
.im5m2
.in1
.ind4
.in3gl
.ink2
.in3n2e
.in3sk
.inu1
.ioni1
.ire3
.is2a
.it2h
.iv2
.ivo3
.joni1
.jor3
.ka2b5l
.ka2i
.ka3le
.ka3ta
.ka4t3io
.ken6num
.ker3s
.ki4e
.klang3
.ko3b
.kopf1
.kor4da
.kraf2
.ks4
.kus2
.la3be
.la3ho
.lase2
.le4ar
.le4gas
.le3n2i
.len3z
.lich8t7er8s
.li2f
.li3po
.li4ve.
.lo4g3in
.lo2sc
.los3s2
.lo3ver
.lö4ss
.lus2
.luster6
.lu4str
.lut4h
.ma3d
.mal4e
.mas8sen.
.ma4str
.mat4c
.matu3
.md2
.me3l2a
.me3ne
.me3no
.men8schl
.men8schw
.ment4
.mes4sp
.mi2f
.mik4
.mil2z
.mi2t1
.mm2
.na3no
.na3t
.nat2h
.näs5c
.nebe4n
.ner2f
.ne1ro
.nich2
.nicht5e
.ni2e
.ni3k4l
.nob4
.no2c
.no2s
.no4th
.nul2
.nus4
.oa5s
.ob1a
.obe2
.ober5ei
.of2e
.ohr5s
.oper4
.or2a
.ord4e
.ort2
.ort4h
.orts3e
.os3s
.os5t6alg
.oste2
.ost3el
.ost5end
.osten8de
.oste6re
.ost3r
.ot1
.ozo4
.öl3l
.pab4
.pa2r1e
.par3t4h
.pe2c
.pe3la
.pe3le
.pe4ste
.pf4
.ph4
.poka2
.po6stei
.po4str
.ps2
.rabe4
.ra3ch4e
.ra3me
.ra4sp
.ra4s3s
.rau2m
.rau8schl
.re3ale
.rebs2
.re3cha
.re5insz
.reis6e5i
.reli1
.res2t
.re4stu
.ri4as
.richt6e
.ro4a
.ro3be
.ro2ha
.ro3m4a
.ro2tr
.ro3tu
.rö2sc
.rö4ss
.rös3se
.ruf3s
.ruh2r1
.runder6
.ru5s6ses
.rü1b
.rücker6
.rü4ss
.sa3br
.sali1
.sami1
.sas2
.sa3sse
.sau1c
.sau5er.
.sä5s4
.sch4
.schaf8t7end
.scheiner8
.scho7s8se.
.scho7s8ses.
.se2ei
.se2ha
.sein2
.sen4f
.sen3s
.se3re
.se1ro
.se2t1
.sha2
.si3gn
.si2te
.ski1e
.sour2
.spani7er.
.spä5s4
.spiege8lei
.st4
.ste2i
.steiner8k
.sto4re
.stras4
.sucher6
.tage4s
.tan4k3a
.tan4k3l
.ta3ra
.tar3t
.ta2t3h
.ta2to
.ta2t1u
.te2e
.te2f
.tehe3
.teiler8s
.tei8l7ersc
.te3l
.te3no
.ten3s
.te1ra
.te6stei
.te6stel
.tester8g
.tester8h
.th4
.ti2e
.ti2me
.ti4mes
.ti2s
.ti8sch7end
.tite4
.tode2
.to4der
.to2n
.to4nat
.to3nes
.to4nin
.to4pl
.to2pr
.to2w
.tras3
.tra4ss
.tri3e4s
.trockenmas8
.ts4
.tsa3
.tse3
.tu3ra
.tu3ri
.turm1
.tur4ma
.ub2
.ufe2
.ufer1
.ul2b3
.um3
.ume2
.umo2
.ums2
.un3a2
.un3d
.une4
.un3g
.uni2t
.ur3a2d
.ural4
.uran6fa
.ur1c
.ur1e
.ur4inf
.ur3o4m
.ur1o2p
.ur3s2
.ut2a
.ut3r
.übe4
.ve5n2e
.vol2
.vo4r
.wah4l
.wa2s
.weg5s
.wei4ta
.welter8e
.welter8kl
.wer6ker
.wer4kr
.wer4tr
.wetterer8s
.wi4e
.wor2
.wort5en6
.wur2f1
.xe3
.ya4l
.zahn3
.zeit3s
.zel4la4
.zelle4
.zel6lei
.zel4li
.zeug4i
.zi2e
.zie4l3u
.zin4ka
.zin4s3c
.zin4st
.zol2
.zuch2
.zucht3
.zug3l
.zu4gra
.zu2pf
.zweigen8
.zwei8g7end
a1ab
aa2be
aa1c
a1a2ce
aa2gr
a1akt
a1a2n
a2ans
a1aq
2a2ar
aa2r3a
aar3b
aar3d
aa3rea
aa2rei
aarf4
aar3g2
aar3k4
aar3t4
1aas
aas1t
aa2th
aa2t3r
aat4s1
2a3au
a1ä
a1b
2aba
ab1alt
ab2am
ab2ant
ab1au
ab2aut
ab1ä
ab2är
ab2äu
2abbat
2abbin
1abd
4a3be.
4a3bec
abe1e
ab1eic
abe3i4d
ab1eil
ab1ein
4ab2el
abe2la
abela4d
abe2le
abe4l3in
1abent
2aber
a2berd
a3beri
ab1er2k
ab1er2r
ab1er2z
4abes
abe2s1e
ab3esse
abes2t
ab1eß
2ab2et
2abew
1abf
1abg
3abga
1abh
2abi
4abil
ab1ins
ab1ir
3ab1it
1abk
ab1l
1a2bla
a4blag
a3blat
a4blau
1a2blä
ab4le.
3ab3lei
2ablet
ab3li
a2blin
ab4lit
2ablo
1a2blö
2ablu
abma3s
1abn
2a3bo
3a4bo.
ab2of
3a4bon
4abot
2abö
ab3r
a4brä
a2bre
2abro
ab4ros
2abrö
1absc
1ab3s2p
abs2t2
1abtei
3abtr
2abu
a2bum
ab1ur
2abü
1abw
2aby
3abz
2a3ca
ac1c
a1cem
a1cen
a1cet
ach1a
a1chal
a3chari
ach3as
ach3au
2achb
a1che
a2ch1e2c
ach1ei
ach4ei.
a2chep
a4cherf
ach5erfa
a4ch3erh
a4ch3erl
a4cherö
a4ch3erw
2achf
2a1chi
a2chim
ach3l
2ach3m
ach3n
a1cho
a3cho.
ach1ob
a2cho2r
ach3ö
2ach3r
2achsc
achs4el
ach3s4i
ach3skr
achs4or
ach3su
a4cht
ach4tak
ach8tersp
ach6t5erw
ach4tin
ach2t1o
ach8traum
ach8träume.
ach8träumen.
ach6trit
ach4tum
a1chu
ach1u2f
ach3ü
2achv
4ach1w
a2chy
2a1ci
4ack.
ackmu4
ackmus3
ack2sp
acksta4
2a1cl
a3co
acon4n
2acu
a1ç
a1d
2ad.
2ada.
4adab
a2dac
a2dad
ad2ag
adai4
ad1ama
a2d1an
3adap
4a3d2a2r3
2adat
a2d1au
a3dau.
1a2dä
ad1c
1add
2ade.
ade2al
a3dec
a3dee
adefi4
2adeg
4aden
a3dena
ade1ra
4ades2
ade3sp
ades4s
2adf
4adh
4adi
adi3en
adi3er.
adie4sc
3adj
2adli
4admu
ad2ob
1a2dop
2adp
2adq
2ad3rec
ad3rei
ad3run
2ads2
ad3sz
2ad2t1
adte2
adt3h
1adv
2a1e1
ae2b
a2ec
ae2d
ae2i
a2ek
a3el.
a2ela
a2ele
a2eli
a3els
ae2m
ae2o3
ae2p
a3er.
3a2er2o
aes2a
ae4sc
ae2ta
a2ew
ae2x
2afa
af1ab
a2f1a2n
a3far
a2f1au4
2afä
a2f1än
2afe
a2f1ec
a4fentl
a4f1ep
aff4a
af2f3l
af4flu
2afi
afi2e1i
afi6kanz
afi4kat
afi2t
2af3l
af1la
a1flu
2afo
a2f3oc
a2ford
2afra
af3rau
af3rä
af3re
2afro
af3rö
af4rü
af3s2a
af3sh
af2si
af2sp
af2t1a
af2tei
af2te2l
aft4erk
af2t1o
af2tö
aft3r
af2tra
af2t5re
af2tur
a2f3ur
2afü
a1g
2ag.
2aga
ag1a2b
ag1a2d
ag1am
ag1ar
a2g1au
agd1
ag2del
ag2di
ag2dr
ag2du
4age.
age1i
agein4s
age4ler
ag2em
2agen.
age4neb
a4gentu
2ages
age4sam
age4s3i
age2s3p
ages5s
ages6sen
age4s3ti
3aggr
a2g1id
a2gim
2a2g1l
ag4lan
ag4las
a4glö
2agm
ag2n
ag4nat
a4gnä
ag4ne.
ag4nu
ag3rat
a2g3re
a2g3ri
ag4ro
2ags
ag3sah
ag4sam
ag3s4eid
ags8porta
ag2s1tr
2agt
ag2th
2agu
a2gund
2ah.
a1ha
ah2an
ah4at
a1hä
2a1he
ahe1in
a2h1er2h
ahe1u
a1h2i
ahin3
ah2l3a2
ah2l1ä
ah4l1ei
ah2lel
ahle4na
ah4l3erd
ah4l3erh
ahl1o2
ah2lö
ahl3sz
ahme1i
ah3mu
ah4n3a
ah2nä
ah3nee
ahn3el
ah4nerd
ahner4e
ahner6le
ahner4n
ah2nin
ah2no
1a2hor
ah1os
a2h3ö
4ahr
ahr1a
ah3r2e
ahren6sc
ahre4s3
ah3ri
ahrta2
ahr2ti
ahr4tri
ahr4tro
ahr4tun
ah2ta
ah2te2l
ah2t1ex
ah2t5r
aht1s2
a1hu
ah1w
a1hy
2ai.
ai3a4
a1ia.
2aib
ai2bl
aid4s
aids1t
ai1e4
ai3en1
aif4
ai1fr
ai3g4
a3ik.
ai3ke
ai2lar
ail3d4
ai2lei
ail3g
ai2lo
4ain
ain2a
a1ind
ai5n4e
ain3s
ains2p
3airb
ai2sa
a3isch.
ai5schw
ai3s2e
ais3sen
ais5st
ait4
a3iv.
a3ivl
a3ivs
a1j
a2jat
ajekt4o
2ak.
2aka3b4
a2ka3d2
2akal
2a3kam
2akar
ak4at
aka4tak
1akaz
4akä
2akb
2akc
2akd
2a1ke
a2kef
a2k1em
a2k1ent
a2kes
a2keu
4a1ki
ak1ins
1akku
2ak3l
ak4li
a1kna
2ako
2a1kr
ak4ri
3akro3
2aks
ak3sh
ak2t1a2b
ak4tag
ak3tan
2aktb
ak2tel
ak3ten
akt2er
2aktik
2aktis
2aktm
ak2tö
ak2t3r
ak3t4ri
2aktsi
2aktsp
2aktst
2aktw
a1ku
2akun
a2kup
2akur
4a3kü
1akz
3akze
a1la
2ala.
4alabo
al2abr
al1af
al1age
2alai
al1akr
al1am
al1ana
4aland
a2lang
al1anz
al1app
a3lar.
al3arc
a3lare
al2arm
2al3arr
a2lart
ala2s
al1asi
al1ass
ala2t1a
al4atm
alat3z
al1au
al3aug
a1lä
a2l1äm
al1än
al1äu
3albat
al2bär
alber4e
al4berh
al4b3er4w
al2b3l
al2boh
alb3ru
alb5st
al2dä
al4d3erl
al4d3ern
alde2s
ald3inn
al2dr
alds2
2ale
4ale.
ale4ar
al1eb
ale2be
al1ec
a4l3ef
a2l1ei
a3l2eic
a4l3ein
a2l1el
5a2lema
alen1
4a3len.
3alenc
alende4
al3endr
a4l3ends
a2leng
al2enn
ale2p
al1epo
4aler.
a2l1erb
a2l1erf
a2l1erh
aler4kl
a2l3erl
al1erm
aler4mi
a2l1er4r
a2l1ert
3a4l3erwä
4ales
a2l1e4sk
a2less
a2l1eu
al3exi
alf4r
2alg.
3algi
al2gli
al3glo
1algo
3algor
2ali
al2imb
al1imm
ali4nal
al1ind
a2l1inq
al1ins
alken1
al2klö
al2kne
1alkoh
alk3s
al2lab
alla3d
alla2m
al2lan
al2l1ap
al2l1a2r
al6later
al2lä
al3läu
al4lec
3allee
alle4gi
al4leh
al3lend
all3erk
al3les
alle3se
al2leu
al2lid
alli5er.
alli7ers.
al2lob
al2lo2c
al2lop
al2lo2s
al2lö2
all3öse
al2luf
allu4s
al2lü4s
al2map
al3mas
al4m3ast
almo6de.
a2l1ob
3aloe
a2lof
4alog
alo2ga
alo2gr
al1ont
al1ort
a2l1ö
al2ös
3alp.
3alpe.
1alph
al2pho
alp4r
alrat2
al3sak
al6schei
al3ses
al4sh
al3skl
al2stu
al2sum
al2t1ak
al2t1an
1altä
al4temu
al4t3er5f
al2teu
al2tin
alt1op
al2tö
al4t3rat
al2tre
al2t3ri
al2t3ro
alt4stü
2altu
a1lu
alu3b4
al2u3f
alu3g
al1u2k
a2lum
al1umb
al1ur
a3lus
4aly
al2zar
al2zau
alz4erk
al2zw
2am.
am2a
ama3d2
ama3g
2amah
a2malg
2a3m4an
a2m3ap
2amar
ama4sta
a2maz
2amä
4ame.
a2meb
2amel
am4e4n1
amen6s5pr
ame3r2a
a2m1erf
a2meri
ame5r2u
a4mesh
a3met
2amf
am4ing
2amir
2amis
2amit
2amk
2aml
2amm.
am2ma2c
2ammal
amma2n
am2mar
am2mas
amma4sc
am2maß
am4ma4te
ammen8ge.
ammes3
am2mid
ammi2e
am2min
am2mit
am4mo2d
am2mö
ammu2
amm3unt
am4mus
am4mü
amni1
a2mö
2ampe.
2ampen
am4pf
amp2f1a2
ampf1o
2am2ple
2ampo
am3pr
4amsc
am4schl
am3sh
1amt.
am2t1a2
am2t1ä
am2tei
amt3eig
am2tel
2amtem
am4t3ern
am2t1ex
am2tis
am2tit
am2to4
am2tö
am2t3r
am2t1u
2amu
3a2mul
2ana.
2anab
ana3c
anadi1
an2ag
2a3nak
an1alg
ana4lin
ana3ma
2anan
an4and
2anas
a5nat.
ana4th
a5n4atm
ana2tr
an3aug
1an1äs
1anb
2anbas
2anbu
an3ch
2and.
3an3d2ac
and3arm
and3ei
anden6ga
an4d3ent
and5erob
ande2s
an2d1ex
and4sas
and2so
and6spar
and6spas
and6s5paß
and2su
4andu2
an2d1ur
2ane
4ane.
an3ec
a3nee
an2ei.
an3eif
3aneig
a4neis
3a2n1e4k
ane2mi
4anen
aner4fa
an2erh
a4nerke
4anern
a4nerz.
an4erze
an1eth
1anf
2anf.
2anfab
3anfä
an3fe
2anfi
an4fj
anf3le
4anfors
anf5rau
2anfs
an3f2u
4ang.
1angab
an2gan
an2g1ar
2ange.
1angeb
1angeh
an2g1ei
an4g3erf
an4g3er4w
an4g3erz
2angh
2angie
ang1l
an2gla
ang3n
ang1r
ang3ra
1an3gri
4angs.
angt4
1anh
2a3n2i
ani3d
4anie
ani3els
ani5ers.
ani3g2
ani3ke
3a4nim
a4n3ind
a4n3ins
ani2o
an3i4on
a4niso
anis2t
2anj
2ank.
an2kab
an2k1ak
an2kan
an2kei
2anken
ank5erfa
2anki
an2klö
an2klu
ank3no
an4k3opf
an2ko4r
ank1r
ank3ra
an4kras
ank3rä
an2kro
2anks2
ank3se
2ankt
3ankü
1anl
2anlad
3anlag
anma3s2
2anmo
1anmu
2ann.
1annah
an2nar
an3ne
an4nef
2anns
ann4s3p
2annt
2ano.
ano3b
an1od
2anof
2anog
anoi3
a3nol
ano2la
1a2nom
a3nom.
a2n1or
2a3nos
2a1nö
2anpu
1anr
2anrö
an3s4ar
1an3s2ä
1ansc
an3skr
ans1pa
ans3pon
1anspr
1anst
an3s2z
2ant.
an2t3ar
anta4re
an3t2ä
1antá
3antei
an3tha
2antie
3antise
2anto
anton2
3antr
ant3rin
1antw
2anu
anus3s
an4ut
a1nü
1anw
2anwi
an2zä
2anzb
2anzd
1anzei
anze2n
2anzes
2anzg
2anzh
an2zid
an2z1i4n
2anzk
2anzm
2anzr
2anzs
2anzt
1anzü
3anzün
2anzv
2anzw
an2zwa
an2zwi
2anzy
2ao
aof4
ao3i4
a1op
aopf4
a1or
a1os3
aost2
a3ot.
aot4r
ao3t2s
2a1ö4
a1p
4ap.
2apa
a2pe.
a3pel
a2pé
a2pf
ap2fa
1apfel
2apfes
a3pfl
a2pht
2api
2ap3l
ap4la
ap4lä
ap4lo
ap2n
a2pot
2apr
4apro
ap4ster
ap2sto
ap2str
ap3t2
2a3pu
2ar.
a1ra
a3ra.
ar2ab
2ar3abb
ar3abf
ar3abt
ara3d2
ar3adr
a2r3al
a3rale
a3ra3li
a3ralo
2aran
a2r1ang
a2r1anz
2arap
a2r3app
2arar
a3ras
a2r1au
a1rä
1arb
2arb.
2arba
ar2bak
ar2b3at
ar2bau
2arbef
ar4b3ein
2arbek
2arben
2arber
4arbi
2ar2bl
2arbo
2arb1r
ar2bre
2arbs2
arb3se
arb3sk
arb3so
2arb3t4
2arbu
1ar1c
2archl
2archr
ar2dau
arde2l
ar2dob
ar2dop
ar2d3r
ar2du
a2rea
are5aler
a2reb4
aree2
ar1eff
ar1ehr
ar1eid
a3reih
areim3
a2rein
arein4b
arein4s
arein4t
a2rele
4arem
4a5ren.
a5reni
aren6sem
are3r2a
arer2e
a4r3erei
a2rerg
a2r1er3h
a2reri
a2rerk
a2rerl
ar2erw
are3u
arf1r
arf3ra
arf2sp
4arg.
ar3gan
ar2gl
ar2gn
2arg4o
ar3g4r
2arh
2ari
ar2ia
a2rid
ari3e2n
ari3erd
ari3erg
ari5ers.
ar3inf
arin3it
ar1int
a3rio
ar2ir
ar4is
ari2su
a3riu
ar2kal
ar2k1ar
ark3aue
ar2kil
2ark3l
ar4klag
ar2kle
ar2klo
ark4lö
ar2kor
ark3s2a
ark2se
ark3she
arku2
ar2les
ar3mad
ar2mau
ar3m2ä
3armee
ar2m1eg
ar2m1ei
ar4merk
